Missouri, session 2026, HB3273.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 301.472, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 301.472, to read as follows:
301.472. 1. Any motor vehicle owner may receive special license plates for any
motor vehicle the person owns, either solely or jointly, other than an apportioned motor
vehicle or a commercial motor vehicle licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds
gross weight as prescribed in this section after an annual payment of an emblem-use
authorization fee to a professional sports team which has made an agreement pursuant to
subsection 5 of this section. For the purposes of this section a "professional sports team" shall
mean an organization located in this state franchised by the National Professional Soccer
League, the National Women's Soccer League, the National Football League, the National
Basketball Association, the Women's National Basketball Association, the National
Hockey League, the International Hockey League, or the American League or the National
League of Major League Baseball or a team playing in Major League Soccer.
2. The professional sports team which has made an agreement pursuant to subsection
5 of this section and which receives the emblem-use authorization fee hereby authorizes the
use of its official emblem to be affixed on multiyear personalized license plates as provided in
this section. Any vehicle owner may annually apply for the use of the emblem. The director
of revenue shall not authorize the manufacturer of the material to produce such license plates
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3273 2
with the individual seal, logo, or emblem until the department of revenue receives a minimum
of one hundred applications for each specific professional sports team.
3. Upon annual application and payment of a thirty-five dollar emblem-use
contribution to the professional sports team such team shall issue to the vehicle owner,
without further charge, an emblem-use authorization statement, which shall be presented by
the owner to the director of the department of revenue at the time of registration of a motor
vehicle. Upon presentation of the annual statement and payment of a fifteen dollar fee in
addition to the regular registration fees, and presentation of other documents which may be
required by law, the director shall issue a personalized license plate, which shall bear the
official emblem of the professional sports team in a manner determined by the director. Such
license plates shall be made with fully reflective material with a common color scheme and
design, shall be clearly visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by
section 301.130. A fee for the issuance of personalized license plates issued pursuant to
section 301.144 shall not be required for plates issued pursuant to this section.
4. A vehicle owner, who was previously issued a plate with a professional sports team
emblem authorized by this section but who does not provide an emblem-use authorization
statement at a subsequent time of registration, shall be issued a new plate which does not bear
the professional sports team emblem, as otherwise provided by law.
5. The director of the department of revenue is authorized to make agreements with
professional sports teams on behalf of the state which allow the use of any such team's official
emblem pursuant to the provisions of this section as consideration for receiving a thirty-five
dollar emblem-use contribution.
6. Except as provided in subsection 7 of this section, a professional sports team
receiving a thirty-five dollar contribution shall forward such contribution, less an amount not
in excess of five percent of the contribution for the costs of administration, to the Jackson
County Sports Authority or the St. Louis Regional Convention and Visitors Commission.
The moneys shall be administered as follows:
(1) The sports authority may retain not in excess of five percent of all funds
forwarded to it pursuant to this section for the costs of administration and shall expend the
remaining balance of such funds, after consultation with a professional sports team within the
authority's area, on marketing and promoting such team. The amount of money expended
from the funds obtained pursuant to this section by the authority per professional sports team
shall be in the same proportion to the total funds available to be expended on such team as the
proportion of contributions forwarded by the team to the authority is to the total contributions
received by the authority;
(2) The regional convention and visitors commission shall hold the revenues received
from the professional sports teams in the St. Louis area in separate accounts for each team.

HB 3273 3
Each team may submit an annual marketing plan to the commission. Expenses of a team
which are in accordance with the marketing plan shall be reimbursed by the commission as
long as moneys are available in the account. The commission may retain not in excess of five
percent for the costs of administration. If no marketing plan is submitted by a team, the
commission shall market and promote the team.
7. The Kansas City Chiefs shall forward all emblem-use fees received, less an amount
not in excess of five percent of the costs of administration, to the Chiefs' Children's Fund, a
not-for-profit fund established to benefit children in need in the Kansas City area.
8. The director of the department of revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations
for the administration of this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to the
authority of this section shall become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536.
✔